District of Columbia statutes.
47-3110

Repealed

Agent.

Repealed.

Oct. 4, 1978, D.C. Law 2-114, § 11, 25 DCR 1985
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-140, § 28, 47 DCR 3431
1981 Ed., § 47-3110.
1973 Ed., § 47-3210.